South Dakota, session 2026, HB1222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-16G:
A member of the Board of Economic Development may not have an a direct
ownership interest in, or serve on the board of, any entity receiving an award,
disbursement, expenditure, or grant of public moneys from or approved by the Board of
Economic Development.
For purposes of this section, ownership of stock or another equity interest
purchased on the open market and held as a passive investment, without the ability to
control, influence, or direct the affairs of the entity, does not constitute direct ownership.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.